test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-subst-2tav-o_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

# ok

Tests:
  Noun - šaddo:
    šaddo+N+Sg+Nom:  šaddo
    šaddo+N+Sg+Gen:  šado
    šaddo+N+Sg+Acc:  šado
    šaddo+N+Sg+Ill:  šaadon
    šaddo+N+Sg+Loc:  šaddoost
    šaddo+N+Sg+Com:  šaddoin
    šaddo+N+Sg+Abe:  šadottáá
    šaddo+N+Ess:  šaddon
    šaddo+N+Par:  šaddod
    šaddo+N+Pl+Nom:  šadoh
    šaddo+N+Pl+Gen:  šadoi
    šaddo+N+Pl+Acc:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Ill:  šaddoid
    šaddo+N+Pl+Loc:  šadoin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Com:  šadoiguin
    šaddo+N+Pl+Abe:  šadoittáá

  Noun - avdo:
    avdo+N+Sg+Nom:  avdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Gen:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Acc:  aavdo
    avdo+N+Sg+Ill:  aavdon
    avdo+N+Sg+Loc:  aavdost
    avdo+N+Sg+Com:  avdoin
    avdo+N+Sg+Abe:  avdottáá
    avdo+N+Ess:  avdon
    avdo+N+Par:  avdod
    avdo+N+Pl+Nom:  aavdoh
    avdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [aavdoi, avdoi]
    avdo+N+Pl+Acc:  aavdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Ill:  aavdoid
    avdo+N+Pl+Loc:  aavdoin
    avdo+N+Pl+Com:  avdoiguin
    avdo+N+Pl+Abe:  avdoittáá

  Noun - taŋgo:
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Nom:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Gen:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Acc:  taŋgo
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Ill:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Loc:  taŋgoost
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Com:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Sg+Abe:  taŋgottáá
    taŋgo+N+Ess:  taŋgon
    taŋgo+N+Par:  taŋgod
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Nom:  taŋgoh
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Gen:  taŋgoi
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Acc:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Ill:  taŋgoid
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Loc:  taŋgoin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Com:  taŋgoiguin
    taŋgo+N+Pl+Abe:  taŋgoittáá

  Noun - pargo:
    pargo+N+Sg+Nom:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Gen:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Acc:  pargo
    pargo+N+Sg+Ill:  paargon
    pargo+N+Sg+Loc:  pargoost
    pargo+N+Sg+Com:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Sg+Abe:  pargottáá
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargon
    pargo+N+Ess:  pargod
    pargo+N+Pl+Nom:  pargoh
    pargo+N+Pl+Gen:  pargoi
    pargo+N+Pl+Acc:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Ill:  pargoid
    pargo+N+Pl+Loc:  pargoin
    pargo+N+Pl+Com:  pargoiguin
    pargo+N+Pl+Abe:  pargoittáá

  Noun - taho:
    taho+N+Sg+Nom:  taho
    taho+N+Sg+Gen:  tavo
    taho+N+Sg+Acc:  tavo
    taho+N+Sg+Ill:  tahon
    taho+N+Sg+Loc:  tavvoost
    taho+N+Sg+Com:  tavvoin
    taho+N+Sg+Abe:  tavottáá
    taho+N+Ess:  tahhoon
    taho+N+Par: tahhood
    taho+N+Pl+Nom:  tavoh
    taho+N+Pl+Gen:  tavoi
    taho+N+Pl+Acc:  tavoid
    taho+N+Pl+Ill:  tavvoid
    taho+N+Pl+Loc:  tavoin
    taho+N+Pl+Com:  tavoiguin
    taho+N+Pl+Abe:  tavoittáá

  Noun - lajo:
    lajo+N+Sg+Nom:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Gen:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Acc:  lajo
    lajo+N+Sg+Ill:  lajon
    lajo+N+Sg+Loc:  laajoost
    lajo+N+Sg+Com:  lajoin
    lajo+N+Sg+Abe:  lajottáá
    lajo+N+Ess:  laijoon
    lajo+N+Par: laijood
    lajo+N+Pl+Nom:  lajoh
    lajo+N+Pl+Gen:  lajoi
    lajo+N+Pl+Acc:  lajoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Ill:  lajoid
    lajo+N+Pl+Loc:  lajoin
    lajo+N+Pl+Com:  lajoiguin
    lajo+N+Pl+Abe:  lajoittáá

  Noun - vajo:
    vajo+N+Sg+Nom:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Gen:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Acc:  vajo
    vajo+N+Sg+Ill:  vajon
    vajo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaajoost
    vajo+N+Sg+Com:  vajoin
    vajo+N+Sg+Abe:  vajottáá
    vajo+N+Ess:  vaijoon
    vajo+N+Par:  vaijood
    vajo+N+Pl+Nom:  vajoh
    vajo+N+Pl+Gen:  vajoi
    vajo+N+Pl+Acc:  vajoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Ill:  vajoid
    vajo+N+Pl+Loc:  vajoin
    vajo+N+Pl+Com:  vajoiguin
    vajo+N+Pl+Abe:  vajoittáá

  Noun - savo:
    savo+N+Sg+Nom:  savo
    savo+N+Sg+Gen:  savo
    savo+N+Sg+Acc:  savo
    savo+N+Sg+Ill:  savon
    savo+N+Sg+Loc:  saavoost
    savo+N+Sg+Com:  savoin
    savo+N+Sg+Abe:  savottáá
    savo+N+Ess:  savvoon
    savo+N+Par: savvood
    savo+N+Pl+Nom:  savoh
    savo+N+Pl+Gen:  savoi
    savo+N+Pl+Acc:  savoid
    savo+N+Pl+Ill:  savvoid
    savo+N+Pl+Loc:  savoin
    savo+N+Pl+Com:  savoiguin
    savo+N+Pl+Abe:  savoittáá

  Noun - vašo:
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Acc:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill:  vašon
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaššoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com:  vašoin
    vašo+N+Sg+Abe:  vašottáá
    vašo+N+Ess:  vaššoon
    vašo+N+Par: vaššood 
    vašo+N+Pl+Nom:  vašoh
    vašo+N+Pl+Gen:  vašoi
    vašo+N+Pl+Acc:  vašoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Ill:  vašoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Loc:  vašoin
    vašo+N+Pl+Com:  vašoiguin
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe:  vašoittáá


  Noun - lahko:
    lahko+N+Sg+Nom:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Gen:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Acc:  lahko
    lahko+N+Sg+Ill:  laahkon
    lahko+N+Sg+Loc:  lahkoost
    lahko+N+Sg+Com:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Sg+Abe:  lahkottáá
    lahko+N+Ess:  lahkon
    lahko+N+Par:  lahkod
    lahko+N+Pl+Nom:  lahkoh
    lahko+N+Pl+Gen:  lahkoi
    lahko+N+Pl+Acc:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Ill:  lahkoid
    lahko+N+Pl+Loc:  lahkoin
    lahko+N+Pl+Com:  lahkoiguin
    lahko+N+Pl+Abe:  lahkoittáá

  Noun - saŋkko:
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Nom:  saŋkko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Gen:  saŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Acc:  saŋko
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Ill:  saaŋkon
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Loc:  saŋkkoost
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Com:  saŋkkoin
    saŋkko+N+Sg+Abe:  saŋkottáá
    saŋkko+N+Ess:  saŋkkon
    saŋkko+N+Par:  saŋkkod
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Nom:  saŋkoh
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Gen:  saŋkoi
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Acc:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Ill:  saŋkkoid
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Loc:  saŋkoin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Com:  saŋkoiguin
    saŋkko+N+Pl+Abe:  saŋkoittáá

  Noun - jasko:
    jasko+N+Sg+Nom:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Gen:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Acc:  jasko
    jasko+N+Sg+Ill:  jaaskon
    jasko+N+Sg+Loc:  jaskoost
    jasko+N+Sg+Com:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Sg+Abe:  jaskottáá
    jasko+N+Ess:  jaskon
    jasko+N+Par:  jaskod
    jasko+N+Pl+Nom:  jaskoh
    jasko+N+Pl+Gen:  jaskoi
    jasko+N+Pl+Acc:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Ill:  jaskoid
    jasko+N+Pl+Loc:  jaskoin
    jasko+N+Pl+Com:  jaskoiguin
    jasko+N+Pl+Abe:  jaskoittáá

  Noun - palo:
    palo+N+Sg+Nom:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Gen:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Acc:  palo
    palo+N+Sg+Ill:  palon
    palo+N+Sg+Loc:  paaloost
    palo+N+Sg+Com:  paloin
    palo+N+Sg+Abe:  palottáá
    palo+N+Ess:  palloon
    palo+N+Par:  pallood
    palo+N+Pl+Nom:  paloh
    palo+N+Pl+Gen:  paloi
    palo+N+Pl+Acc:  paloid
    palo+N+Pl+Ill:  paloid
    palo+N+Pl+Loc:  paloin
    palo+N+Pl+Com:  paloiguin
    palo+N+Pl+Abe:  paloittáá

  Noun - njamo:
    njamo+N+Sg+Nom:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Gen:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Acc:  njamo
    njamo+N+Sg+Ill:  njamon
    njamo+N+Sg+Loc:  njaamoost
    njamo+N+Sg+Com:  njamoin
    njamo+N+Sg+Abe:  njamottáá
    njamo+N+Ess:  njammoon
    njamo+N+Par:  njammood
    njamo+N+Pl+Nom:  njamoh
    njamo+N+Pl+Gen:  njamoi
    njamo+N+Pl+Acc:  njamoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Ill:  njamoid
    njamo+N+Pl+Loc:  njamoin
    njamo+N+Pl+Com:  njamoiguin
    njamo+N+Pl+Abe:  njamoittáá

  Noun - asto:
    asto+N+Sg+Nom:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc:  asto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill:  aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc:  astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com:  astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe:  astottáá
    asto+N+Ess:  aston
    asto+N+Par:  astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom:  astoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen:  astoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill:  astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc:  astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com:  astoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe:  astoittáá


  Noun - piano:
    piano+N+Sg+Nom:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Gen:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Acc:  piano
    piano+N+Sg+Ill:  pianon
    piano+N+Sg+Loc:  pianost
    piano+N+Sg+Com:  pianoin
    piano+N+Sg+Abe:  pianottáá
    piano+N+Ess:  pianon
    piano+N+Par:  pianod
    piano+N+Pl+Nom:  pianoh
    piano+N+Pl+Gen:  pianoi
    piano+N+Pl+Acc:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Ill:  pianoid
    piano+N+Pl+Loc:  pianoin
    piano+N+Pl+Com:  pianoiguin
    piano+N+Pl+Abe:  pianoittáá

  Noun - kerho:
    kerho+N+Sg+Nom:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Gen:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Acc:  kerho
    kerho+N+Sg+Ill:  keerhon
    kerho+N+Sg+Loc:  kerhoost
    kerho+N+Sg+Com:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Sg+Abe:  kerhottáá
    kerho+N+Ess:  kerhon
    kerho+N+Par:  kerhod
    kerho+N+Pl+Nom:  kerhoh
    kerho+N+Pl+Gen:  kerhoi
    kerho+N+Pl+Acc:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Ill:  kerhoid
    kerho+N+Pl+Loc:  kerhoin
    kerho+N+Pl+Com:  kerhoiguin
    kerho+N+Pl+Abe:  kerhoittáá

  Noun - pircco:
    pircco+N+Sg+Nom:  pircco
    pircco+N+Sg+Gen:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Acc:  pirco
    pircco+N+Sg+Ill:  piircon
    pircco+N+Sg+Loc:  pirccoost
    pircco+N+Sg+Com:  pirccoin
    pircco+N+Sg+Abe:  pircottáá
    pircco+N+Ess:  pirccon
    pircco+N+Par:  pirccod
    pircco+N+Pl+Nom:  pircoh
    pircco+N+Pl+Gen:  pircoi
    pircco+N+Pl+Acc:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Ill:  pirccoid
    pircco+N+Pl+Loc:  pircoin
    pircco+N+Pl+Com:  pircoiguin
    pircco+N+Pl+Abe:  pircoittáá

  Noun - riddo:
    riddo+N+Sg+Nom:  riddo
    riddo+N+Sg+Gen:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Acc:  rido
    riddo+N+Sg+Ill:  riidon
    riddo+N+Sg+Loc:  riddoost
    riddo+N+Sg+Com:  riddoin
    riddo+N+Sg+Abe:  ridottáá
    riddo+N+Ess:  riddon
    riddo+N+Par:  riddod
    riddo+N+Pl+Nom:  ridoh
    riddo+N+Pl+Gen:  ridoi
    riddo+N+Pl+Acc:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Ill:  riddoid
    riddo+N+Pl+Loc:  ridoin
    riddo+N+Pl+Com:  ridoiguin
    riddo+N+Pl+Abe:  ridoittáá

  Noun - rijdo:
    rijdo+N+Sg+Nom:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Gen:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Acc:  rijdo
    rijdo+N+Sg+Ill:  riijdon
    rijdo+N+Sg+Loc: [riijdost, rijdoost]
    rijdo+N+Sg+Com:  rijdoin
    rijdo+N+Sg+Abe:  rijdottáá
    rijdo+N+Ess:  rijdon
    rijdo+N+Par:  rijdod
    rijdo+N+Pl+Nom:  rijdoh
    rijdo+N+Pl+Gen:  [riijdoi, rijdoi]
    rijdo+N+Pl+Acc:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Ill:  rijdoid
    rijdo+N+Pl+Loc:  rijdoin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Com:  rijdoiguin
    rijdo+N+Pl+Abe:  rijdoittáá

  Noun - pivdo:
    pivdo+N+Sg+Nom:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Gen:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Acc:  pivdo
    pivdo+N+Sg+Ill:  piivdon
    pivdo+N+Sg+Loc: [piivdost, pivdoost]
    pivdo+N+Sg+Com:  pivdoin
    pivdo+N+Sg+Abe:  pivdottáá
    pivdo+N+Ess:  pivdon
    pivdo+N+Par:  pivdod
    pivdo+N+Pl+Nom:  pivdoh
    pivdo+N+Pl+Gen: [piivdoi, pivdoi]
    pivdo+N+Pl+Acc:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Ill:  pivdoid
    pivdo+N+Pl+Loc:  pivdoin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Com:  pivdoiguin
    pivdo+N+Pl+Abe:  pivdoittáá

  Noun - šiljo:
    šiljo+N+Sg+Nom:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Gen:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Acc:  šiljo
    šiljo+N+Sg+Ill:  šiiljon
    šiljo+N+Sg+Loc:  šiljoost
    šiljo+N+Sg+Com:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Sg+Abe:  šiljottáá
    šiljo+N+Ess:  šiljon
    šiljo+N+Par:  šiljod
    šiljo+N+Pl+Nom:  šiljoh
    šiljo+N+Pl+Gen:  šiljoi
    šiljo+N+Pl+Acc:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Ill:  šiljoid
    šiljo+N+Pl+Loc:  šiljoin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Com:  šiljoiguin
    šiljo+N+Pl+Abe:  šiljoittáá

  Noun - vihko:
    vihko+N+Sg+Nom:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Gen:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Acc:  vihko
    vihko+N+Sg+Ill:  viihkon
    vihko+N+Sg+Loc:  vihkoost
    vihko+N+Sg+Com:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Sg+Abe:  vihkottáá
    vihko+N+Ess:  vihkon
    vihko+N+Par:  vihkod
    vihko+N+Pl+Nom:  vihkoh
    vihko+N+Pl+Gen:  vihkoi
    vihko+N+Pl+Acc:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Ill:  vihkoid
    vihko+N+Pl+Loc:  vihkoin
    vihko+N+Pl+Com:  vihkoiguin
    vihko+N+Pl+Abe:  vihkoittáá

  Noun - kirkko:
    kirkko+N+Sg+Nom:  kirkko
    kirkko+N+Sg+Gen:  kirho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Acc:  kirho
    kirkko+N+Sg+Ill:  kiirkon
    kirkko+N+Sg+Loc:  kirhoost
    kirkko+N+Sg+Com:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Sg+Abe:  kirhottáá
    kirkko+N+Ess:  kirkkon
    kirkko+N+Par:  kirkkod
    kirkko+N+Pl+Nom:  kirhoh
    kirkko+N+Pl+Gen:  kirhoi
    kirkko+N+Pl+Acc:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Ill:  kirhoid
    kirkko+N+Pl+Loc:  kirhoin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Com:  kirhoiguin
    kirkko+N+Pl+Abe:  kirhoittáá

  Noun - ilo:
    ilo+N+Sg+Nom:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Gen:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Acc:  ilo
    ilo+N+Sg+Ill:  ilon
    ilo+N+Sg+Loc:  iiloost
    ilo+N+Sg+Com: [iilooin, iiloin]
    ilo+N+Sg+Abe:  ilottáá
    ilo+N+Ess:  illoon
    ilo+N+Par:  illood
    ilo+N+Pl+Nom:  iloh
    ilo+N+Pl+Gen:  iloi
    ilo+N+Pl+Acc:  iloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Ill:  iloid
    ilo+N+Pl+Loc:  iloin
    ilo+N+Pl+Com:  iloiguin
    ilo+N+Pl+Abe:  iloittáá
